District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1959

Refund required for unearned advanced leave; exceptions.

Repealed.

Oct. 13, 1949, 63 Stat. 843, ch. 686, § 5
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78,§ 18, 29 DCR 49
1981 Ed., § 31-1027.
1973 Ed., § 31-695.